apertium-en-af/apertium-en-af.af.dix
    <pardef n="alternatie/f__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>f</l>
	  <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>we</l>
	  <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="stre/ek__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ek</l>
	  <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ke</l>
	  <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="perso/on__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>on</l>
	  <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
	  <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sko/ol__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ol</l>
	  <r>ol<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
	  <r>ol<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="kind__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ers</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="plane/et__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
	  <r>et<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
	  <r>et<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ka/as__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
	  <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>se</l>
	  <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ho/f__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>f</l>
	  <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>we</l>
	  <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="boodskap__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pe</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Afrikaans__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
  </pardef>


    <!-- Acronyms -->
    <pardef n="DNA__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Proper Nouns -->

    <pardef n="Engeland__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- Pronomen -->
    <pardef n="altwee__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="elkeen__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="prsubj__prn">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ek</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>jy</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>hy</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>sy</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>dit</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ons</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>julle</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>hulle</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="probj__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>my</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jou</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hom</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>haar</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dit</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ons</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>julle</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hulle</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Verben -->
    <pardef n="h/ê__vbhaver">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>ê<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>ê<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/wees__vbser">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>wees<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wees</l>
          <r>wees<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l> <!-- cheaty plumbing - remove this when a rule has been written to pri->pres -->
          <r>wees<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="breek__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="k/an__vbmod">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>an<s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>an<s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ou</l>
          <r>an<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="s/al__vbmod">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>al</l>
          <r>al<s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>al</l>
          <r>al<s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ou</l>
          <r>al<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="moe/t__vbmod">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>t<s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>t<s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>t<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
  </pardef>

    <e lm="pronoms personals de subjecte"><i/><par n="prsubj__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="pronoms personals d'objecte"><i/><par n="probj__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="elkeen"><i>elkeen</i><par n="elkeen__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="almal"><i>almal</i><par n="elkeen__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="niks"><i>niks</i><par n="elkeen__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="iets"><i>iets</i><par n="elkeen__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="altwee"><i>altwee</i><par n="altwee__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="kind"><i>kind</i><par n="kind__n"/></e>
    <e lm="appèlhof"><i>appèlho</i><par n="ho/f__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hof"><i>ho</i><par n="ho/f__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kaas"><i>ka</i><par n="ka/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="naweek"><i>nawe</i><par n="stre/ek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="planeet"><i>plane</i><par n="plane/et__n"/></e>
    <e lm="DNA"><i>DNA</i><par n="DNA__n"/></e>
    <e lm="BBP"><i>BBP</i><par n="DNA__n"/></e>
    <e lm="PPP"><i>PPP</i><par n="DNA__n"/></e>
    <e lm="GNU"><i>GNU</i><par n="DNA__n"/></e>
    <e lm="IDV"><i>IDV</i><par n="DNA__n"/></e>
    <e lm="URL"><i>URL</i><par n="DNA__n"/></e>
    <e lm="EIEU"><i>EIEU</i><par n="DNA__n"/></e>
    <e lm="RFC"><i>RFC</i><par n="DNA__n"/></e>
    <e lm="NNTP"><i>NNTP</i><par n="DNA__n"/></e>
    <e lm="SSL"><i>SSL</i><par n="DNA__n"/></e>
    <e lm="PPP"><i>PPP</i><par n="DNA__n"/></e>
    <e lm="WWW"><i>WWW</i><par n="DNA__n"/></e>
    <e lm="SVN"><i>SVN</i><par n="DNA__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Engels"><i>Engels</i><par n="Afrikaans__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Afrikaans"><i>Afrikaans</i><par n="Afrikaans__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Afrika"><i>Afrika</i><par n="Engeland__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Demokratiese Republiek van die Kongo"><i>Demokratiese<b/>Republiek<b/>van<b/>die<b/>Kongo</i><par n="Engeland__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Falkland-eilande"><i>Falkland-eilande</i><par n="Engeland__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Algerië"><i>Algerië</i><par n="Engeland__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Armenië"><i>Armenië</i><par n="Engeland__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Brasilië"><i>Brasilië</i><par n="Engeland__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Kroasië"><i>Kroasië</i><par n="Engeland__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Egipte"><i>Egipte</i><par n="Engeland__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Frankryk"><i>Frankryk</i><par n="Engeland__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Griekeland"><i>Griekeland</i><par n="Engeland__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Ysland"><i>Ysland</i><par n="Engeland__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Irak"><i>Irak</i><par n="Engeland__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Japan"><i>Japan</i><par n="Engeland__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Kirghizstan"><i>Kirghizstan</i><par n="Engeland__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Malta"><i>Malta</i><par n="Engeland__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Nigeria"><i>Nigeria</i><par n="Engeland__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Saudi Arabië"><i>Saudi Arabië</i><par n="Engeland__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Tunisië"><i>Tunisië</i><par n="Engeland__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Zimbabwe"><i>Zimbabwe</i><par n="Engeland__np"/></e>
    <e lm="hê"><i>h</i><par n="h/ê__vbhaver"/></e>
    <e lm="wees"><i/><par n="/wees__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="verskyn"><i>verskyn</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="glo"><i>glo</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="koop"><i>koop</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kam"><i>kam</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="afskakel"><i>afskakel</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dryf"><i>dryf</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="eindig"><i>eindig</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vergeet"><i>vergeet</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="woon"><i>woon</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="speel"><i>speel</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sing"><i>sing</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="slaag"><i>slaag</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="reis"><i>reis</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="polshorlosie"><i>polshorlosie</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="aankondig"><i>aankondig</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="verpak"><i>verpak</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="voorkom"><i>voorkom</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bou"><i>bou</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kan"><i>k</i><par n="k/an__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="sal"><i>s</i><par n="s/al__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="moet"><i>moe</i><par n="moe/t__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="alternatief"><i>alternatie</i><par n="alternatie/f__n"/></e>
    <e lm="persoon"><i>perso</i><par n="perso/on__n"/></e>
    <e lm="streek"><i>stre</i><par n="stre/ek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skool"><i>sko</i><par n="sko/ol__n"/></e>
